scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_C.yaml
     ashidin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashidin 
     ashkam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindashkamaa
     ashkam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashkamaan
     ashkam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashkamaad
     ashkam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshkamaad
     ashkam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashkam
     asho-wiidigem+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indasho-wiidigemaa
     asho-wiidigem+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odasho-wiidigemaan
     asho-wiidigem+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: asho-wiidigemaad
     asho-wiidigem+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: esho-wiidigemaad
     asho-wiidigem+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: asho-wiidigem
     ashoodakamigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg: nindashoodakamiginaa
     ashoodakamigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odashoodakamiginaan
     ashoodakamigin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashoodakamiginaad
     ashoodakamigin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashoodakamigin
     ashoodin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indashoodinaa
     ashoodin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odashoodinaan
     ashoodin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ashoodinaad
     ashoodin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eshoodinaad
     ashoodin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ashoodin
     awazo'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindawazo'aa
     awazo'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odawazo'aan
     awazo'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: awazo'aad
     awazo'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl+3SgObv: ewazo'aad
     awazo'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: awazo'
     awi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indawi'aa
     awi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindawi'aa
     awi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+1Sg: nindawi'ig
     awi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidawi'aa
     awi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+2Sg: gidawi'in
     awi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+1Sg: gidawi'
     awi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odawi'aan
     awi'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: awi'aad
     awi'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ewi'aad
     awi'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: awi'
     awi'aazom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindawi'aazomaa
     awi'aazom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odawi'aazomaan
     awi'aazom+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: awi'aazomaad
     awi'aazom+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ewi'aazomaad
     awi'aazom+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: awi'aazom
     ayaangwaamim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indayaangwaamimaa
     ayaangwaamim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindayaangwaamimaa
     ayaangwaamim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidayaangwaamimaa
     ayaangwaamim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odayaangwaamimaan
     ayaangwaamim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaangwaamimaad
     ayaangwaamim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eyaangwaamimaad
     ayaangwaamim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ayaangwaamim
     ayeko'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indayeko'aa
     ayeko'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindayeko'aa
     ayeko'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidayeko'aa
     ayeko'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odayeko'aan
     ayeko'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayeko'aad
     ayeko'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: eyeko'aad
     ayeko'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: ayeko'
     azhe-ashi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindazhe-asaa
     azhe-ashi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhe-asaad
     azhe-ashi+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+0Sg: odazhe-asaan
     azhe-ashi+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhe-asaad
     azhe-ashi+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhe-asaad
     azhe-ashi+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3: azhe-ashi
     azhen+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhenaa
     azhen+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindazhenaa
     azhen+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidazhenaa
     azhen+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhenaan
     azhen+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhenaad
     azhen+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhenaad
     azhen+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhen
     azheshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazheshimaa
     azheshim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazheshimaan
     azheshim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azheshimaad
     azheshim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezheshimaad
     azheshim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azheshim
     azhewebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indazhewebinaa
     azhewebin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odazhewebinaan
     azhewebin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: azhewebinaad
     azhewebin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ezhewebinaad
     azhewebin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: azhewebin 
     aabaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndaabaji'aa
     aabaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabaji'aa
     aabaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabaji'aa
     aabaji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabaji'aan
     aabaji'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabaji'aad
     aabaji'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabaji'aad
     aabaji'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabaji'
     aabanaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndaabanaabamaa
     aabanaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabanaabamaa
     aabanaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabanaabamaa
     aabanaabam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabanaabamaan
     aabanaabam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabanaabamaad
     aabanaabam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabanaabamaad
     aabanaabam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabanaabam
     aabaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabaabiiginaa
     aabaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabaabiiginaa
     aabaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabaabiiginaa
     aabaabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabaabiiginaan
     aabaabiigin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabaabiiginaad
     aabaabiigin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabaabiiginaad
     aabaabiigin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabaabiigin
     aabaakawi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaabaakawi'aa
     aabaakawi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabaakawi'aa
     aabaakawi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabaakawi'aa
     aabaakawi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabaakawi'aa
     aabaakawi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabaakawi'aan
     aabaakawi'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabaakawi'aad
     aabaakawi'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabaakawi'aad
     aabaakawi'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabaakawi' 
     aabiskon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabiskonaa
     aabiskon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabiskonaa
     aabiskon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabiskonaa
     aabiskon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaabiskonaa
     aabiskon+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiskonaan
     aabiskon+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiskonaad
     aabiskon+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiskonaad
     aabiskon+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiskon
     aabiskwam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabiskwamaa
     aabiskwam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiskwamaan
     aabiskwam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiskwamaad
     aabiskwam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiskwamaad
     aabiskwam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiskwam
     aabiskwegin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabiskweginaa
     aabiskwegin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabiskweginaa
     aabiskwegin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabiskweginaa
     aabiskwegin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiskweginaan
     aabiskwegin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiskweginaad
     aabiskwegin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiskweginaad
     aabiskwegin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiskwegin
     aabitawam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaabitawamaa
     aabitawam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabitawamaan
     aabitawam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabitawamaad
     aabitawam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabitawamaad
     aabitawam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabitawam
     aabitoojiin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabitoojiinaa
     aabitoojiin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabitoojiinaan
     aabitoojiin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabitoojiinaad
     aabitoojiin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabitoojiin
     aabitooshkina'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaabitooshkina'aa
     aabitooshkina'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabitooshkina'aa
     aabitooshkina'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaabitooshkina'aa
     aabitooshkina'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabitooshkina'aan
     aabitooshkina'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabitooshkina'aad
     aabitooshkina'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabitooshkina'aad
     aabitooshkina'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aabitooshkina'
     aabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaabiiginaa
     aabiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiiginaan
     aabiigin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiiginaad
     aabiigin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiiginaad
     aabiigin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiigin
     aabiindaganaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaabiindaganaamaa
     aabiindaganaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiindaganaamaan
     aabiindaganaam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiindaganaamaad
     aabiindaganaam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiindaganaamaad
     aabiindaganaam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiindaganaam
     aabiinji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndaabiinji'aa
     aabiinji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaabiinji'aa
     aabiinji'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiinji'aan
     aabiinji'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiinji'aad
     aabiinji'+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiinji'aad
     aabiinji'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiinji'
     aabiinzom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaabiinzomaa
     aabiinzom+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaabiinzomaan
     aabiinzom+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aabiinzomaad
     aabiinzom+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaabiinzomaad
     aabiinzom+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aabiinzom
     aaboodin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaaboodinaa
     aaboodin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaaboodinaa
     aaboodin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaaboodinaa
     aaboodin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaboodinaan
     aaboodin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaboodinaad
     aaboodin+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaaboodinaad
     aaboodin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaboodin
     aaboojishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaaboojishimaa
     aaboojishim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaboojishimaan
     aaboojishim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaboojishimaad
     aaboojishim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaaboojishimaad
     aaboojishim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaboojishim
     aaboojiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaaboojiiginaa
     aaboojiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaaboojiiginaa
     aaboojiigin+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaaboojiiginaan
     aaboojiigin+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aaboojiiginaad
     aaboojiigin+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aaboojiigin
     aadawa'am+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaadawa'amaa
     aadawa'am+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaadawa'amaa
     aadawa'am+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaadawa'amaa
     aadawa'am+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaadawa'amaan
     aadawa'am+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aadawa'amaad
     aadawa'am+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaadawa'amaad
     aadawa'am+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: aadawa'am
     aagonweyenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaagonweyenimaa
     aagonweyenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaagonweyenimaa
     aagonweyenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaagonweyenimaa
     aagonweyenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaagonweyenimaan
     aagonweyenim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aagonweyenimaad
     aagonweyenim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaagonweyenimaad
     aagonweyenim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aagonweyenim
     aajim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaajimaa
     aajim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaajimaa
     aajim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaajimaa
     aajim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaajimaan
     aajim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aajimaad
     aajim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaajimaad
     aajim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aajim
     aakomaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaakomaamaa
     aakomaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaakomaamaa
     aakomaam+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaakomaamaan
     aakomaam+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aakomaamaad
     aakomaam+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaakomaamaad
     aakomaam+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aakomaam
     aanawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: ndaanawenimaa
     aanawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaanawenimaa
     aanawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nidaanawenimaa
     aanawenim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaanawenimaan
     aanawenim+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aanawenimaad
     aanawenim+VTA+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: ayaanawenimaad
     aanawenim+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0: aanawenim
     aandabi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: nindaandabi'aa
     aandabi'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: niyaandabi'aa
     aandabi'+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: odaandabi'aan
     aandabi'+VTA+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg+3SgObv: aandabi'aad
     aandabi'+VTA+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3: aandabi'
     aandagim+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3Sg: indaandagimaa
